Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, SB1675.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 44-1799.71, Arizona Revised Statutes, is transferred and renumbered for placement in title 13, chapter 29, Arizona Revised Statutes, as section 13-2910.13 and, as so renumbered, is amended to read: START_STATUTE13-2910.13. Unlawful public sale of animals; classification; definitions A. In a county with a population of eight five hundred thousand persons or more, a person commits the unlawful public sale of animals by knowingly selling it is unlawful for a person to sell, market, offer, barter, give away, display, advertise for sale or advertise for adoption an animal on: 1. Any public highway, street or park or any public property adjacent to a public highway, street or park. 2. Any commercial private property without the express consent of the owner or lessee of the property. B. Subsection A of this section does not apply to: 1. Retail sales on the premises of a pet store. 2. Sales by a publicly operated or private, charitable nonprofit pound, humane society, animal rescue organization, animal shelter or educational or agricultural organization. 3. Any rodeo, auction market, county fair, stock show or other sanctioned livestock exhibit event. C. A person who is found responsible for a violation of violates this section is subject to a civil penalty of not more than fifty dollars guilty of a petty offense, except that a second or subsequent violation is a class 1 misdemeanor. D. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Animal" means any living species of mammal, bird, amphibian or reptile. 2. "Pet store" has the same meaning prescribed in section 44-1799. END_STATUTE